Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325E.86] BIOMETRIC PRIVACY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Biometric identifier" means a retina or iris scan, fingerprint, voiceprint, or scan of hand or face geometry. Biometric identifiers shall not include writing samples, written signatures, photographs, human biological samples used for valid scientific testing or screening, demographic data, tattoo descriptions, or physical descriptions such as height, weight, hair color, or eye color. Biometric identifiers shall not include anatomical gifts as defined in section 525A.02 or blood or serum stored on behalf of recipients or potential recipients of living or cadaveric transplants and obtained or stored by a federally designated organ procurement agency. Biometric identifiers do not include information captured from a patient in a health care setting or information collected, used, or stored for health care treatment, payment, or operations under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. Biometric identifiers do not include an X-ray, roentgen process, computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, positron-emission tomography scan, mammography, or other image or film of the human anatomy used to diagnose, prognose, or treat an illness or other medical condition or to further validate scientific testing or screening. new text end new text begin (c) "Biometric information" means any information, regardless of how it is captured, converted, stored, or shared, based on an individual's biometric identifier used to identify an individual. Biometric information shall not include information derived from items or procedures excluded under the definition of biometric identifiers. new text end new text begin (d) "Confidential and sensitive information" means personal information that can be used to uniquely identify an individual or an individual's account or property which shall include, but shall not be limited to, a genetic marker, genetic testing information, a unique identifier number to locate an account or property, an account number, a personal identification number, a pass code, a driver's license number, or a social security number. new text end new text begin (e) "Private entity" means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other group, however organized. A private entity shall not include a state or local government agency or any court in the state, a clerk of the court, or a judge or justice of the court. new text end new text begin (f) "Written release" means informed written consent or, in the context of employment, a release executed by an employee as a condition of employment. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Retention; collection; disclosure; destruction. new text end new text begin (a) A private entity in possession of biometric identifiers or biometric information must develop a written policy, made available to the public, establishing a retention schedule and guidelines for permanently destroying biometric identifiers and biometric information when the initial purpose for collecting or obtaining such identifiers or information has been satisfied or within three years of the individual's last interaction with the private entity, whichever occurs first. Absent a valid warrant or subpoena issued by a court, a private entity in possession of biometric identifiers or biometric information must comply with its established retention schedule and destruction guidelines. new text end new text begin (b) No private entity may collect, capture, purchase, receive through trade, or otherwise obtain a person's or a customer's biometric identifier or biometric information, unless it first: new text end new text begin (1) informs the subject or the subject's legally authorized representative in writing that a biometric identifier or biometric information is being collected or stored; new text end new text begin (2) informs the subject or the subject's legally authorized representative in writing of the specific purpose and length of term for which a biometric identifier or biometric information is being collected, stored, and used; and new text end new text begin (3) receives a written release executed by the subject of the biometric identifier or biometric information or the subject's legally authorized representative. new text end new text begin (c) No private entity in possession of a biometric identifier or biometric information may sell, lease, trade, or otherwise profit from a person's or a customer's biometric identifier or biometric information. new text end new text begin (d) No private entity in possession of a biometric identifier or biometric information may disclose, redisclose, or otherwise disseminate a person's or a customer's biometric identifier or biometric information unless: new text end new text begin (1) the subject of the biometric identifier or biometric information or the subject's legally authorized representative consents to the disclosure or redisclosure; new text end new text begin (2) the disclosure or redisclosure completes a financial transaction requested or authorized by the subject of the biometric identifier or the biometric information or the subject's legally authorized representative; new text end new text begin (3) the disclosure or redisclosure is required by federal, state, or local law or municipal ordinance; or new text end new text begin (4) the disclosure is required pursuant to a valid warrant or subpoena issued by a court. new text end new text begin (e) A private entity in possession of a biometric identifier or biometric information shall: new text end new text begin (1) store, transmit, and protect from disclosure all biometric identifiers and biometric information using the reasonable standard of care within the private entity's industry; and new text end new text begin (2) store, transmit, and protect from disclosure all biometric identifiers and biometric information in a manner that is the same as or more protective than the manner in which the private entity stores, transmits, and protects other confidential and sensitive information. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Right of action. new text end new text begin Any person aggrieved by a violation of this section shall have a right of action in district court against an offending party. A prevailing party may recover for each violation: new text end new text begin (1) against a private entity that negligently violates a provision of this section, liquidated damages of $1,000 or actual damages, whichever is greater; new text end new text begin (2) against a private entity that intentionally or recklessly violates a provision of this section, liquidated damages of $5,000 or actual damages, whichever is greater; new text end new text begin (3) reasonable attorney fees and costs, including expert witness fees and other litigation expenses; and new text end new text begin (4) other relief, including an injunction, as the court may deem appropriate. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Construction with other laws. new text end new text begin (a) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impact the admission or discovery of biometric identifiers and biometric information in any action of any kind in any court, or before any tribunal, board, agency, or person. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to apply in any manner to a financial institution or an affiliate of a financial institution that is subject to Title V of the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999. new text end new text begin (d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to a contractor, subcontractor, or agent of a state agency or local government when working for that state agency or local government. new text end